Florida, session 2026, SB1550.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 59 60 Section 1.âSection 723.005, Florida Statutes, is amended to 61 read: 62 723.005âRegulation by division.âExcept as provided in this 63 chapter, the division has the power and duty to enforce and 64 ensure compliance with the provisions of this chapter and rules 65 promulgated pursuant hereto relating to the rental, development, 66 and sale of mobile home parks. However, the division does not 67 have the power or duty to enforce mobile home park rules and 68 regulations or to enforce the provisions of ss. 723.022, 69 723.023, and 723.033. 70 Section 2.âSection 723.022, Florida Statutes, is amended to 71 read: 72 723.022âMobile home park ownerâs general obligations.â 73 (1)âA mobile home park owner shall at all times: 74 (a)(1)âComply with the requirements of applicable building, 75 housing, and health codes. 76 (b)(2)âMaintain buildings and improvements in common areas 77 in a good state of repair and maintenance and maintain the 78 common areas in a good state of appearance, safety, and 79 cleanliness. 80 (c)(3)âProvide access to the common areas, including 81 buildings and improvements thereto, at all reasonable times for 82 the benefit of the park residents and their guests. 83 (d)(4)âMaintain utility connections and systems for which 84 the park owner is responsible in proper operating condition. 85 (e)(5)âComply with properly promulgated park rules and 86 regulations and require other persons on the premises with his 87 or her consent to comply therewith and conduct themselves in a 88 manner that does not unreasonably disturb the park residents or 89 constitute a breach of the peace. 90 (2)âA person who is injured by a violation of this section 91 may file a complaint with the Department of Legal Affairs. The 92 Department of Legal Affairs has the authority to enforce 93 compliance with this section. The Department of Legal Affairs 94 may adopt rules to implement this subsection. 95 Section 3.âSection 723.023, Florida Statutes, is amended to 96 read: 97 723.023âMobile home ownerâs general obligations.â 98 (1)âA mobile home owner shall: 99 (a)(1)âAt all times comply with all obligations imposed on 100 mobile home owners by applicable provisions of building, 101 housing, and health codes, including compliance with all 102 building permits and construction requirements for construction 103 on the mobile home and lot. The home owner is responsible for 104 all fines imposed by the local government for noncompliance with 105 any local codes. 106 (b)(2)âAt all times keep the mobile home lot that he or she 107 occupies clean, neat, and sanitary, and maintained in compliance 108 with all local codes. 109 (c)(3)âAt all times comply with properly promulgated park 110 rules and regulations and require other persons on the premises 111 with his or her consent to comply with such rules and to conduct 112 themselves, and other persons on the premises with his or her 113 consent, in a manner that does not unreasonably disturb other 114 residents of the park or constitute a breach of the peace. 115 (d)(4)âReceive written approval from the mobile home park 116 owner before making any exterior modification or addition to the 117 home. 118 (e)(5)âWhen vacating the premises, remove any debris and 119 other property of any kind which is left on the mobile home lot. 120 (2)âA person who is injured by a violation of this section 121 may file a complaint with the Department of Legal Affairs. The 122 Department of Legal Affairs has the authority to enforce 123 compliance with this section. The Department of Legal Affairs 124 may adopt rules to implement this subsection. 125 Section 4.âSubsection (6) of section 723.033, Florida 126 Statutes, is amended to read: 127 723.033âUnreasonable lot rental agreements; increases, 128 changes.â 129 (6)âIn determining whether a rent increase or resulting lot 130 rental amount is unreasonable, the court may consider economic 131 or other factors, including, but not limited to, all of the 132 following: 133 (a)âThe number of active sales within the mobile home park 134 at the time the notice of rent increase is issued. 135 (b)âIncentives and other discounts being offered to new 136 purchasers by the mobile home park owner or the mobile home 137 owner. 138 (c)âThe number of mobile homes abandoned or the number of 139 titles transferred by the mobile home owner to the mobile home 140 park owner in the previous 12 months for the purpose of avoiding 141 eviction or to otherwise not terminate an existing rental 142 agreement. 143 (d)âIncreases or decreases in the consumer price index, 144 published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the Department of 145 Labor.; 146 (e)âIncreases or decreases in operating costs or taxes.; 147 and 148 (f)âPrior disclosures. 149 Section 5.âSection 723.034, Florida Statutes, is created to 150 read: 151 723.034âRequirements for electronic billing or payment 152 systems.â 153 (1)âA mobile home park owner may not engage, or permit an 154 employee or agent of the park owner to engage, in any of the 155 following acts or practices: 156 (a)âRequiring a mobile home owner to use an electronic 157 billing or payment system as the only method to pay the lot 158 rental amount or user fees. 159 (b)âAssessing a fee or other charge to a mobile home owner 160 for his or her refusal or inability to pay the lot rental amount 161 or user fees through an electronic billing or payment system 162 used by the mobile home park owner. 163 (c)âUsing an electronic billing or payment system that 164 requires a mobile home owner to waive individual or collective 165 rights or remedies otherwise provided by law. 166 (d)âUsing an electronic billing or payment system that 167 collects, or requires access to, a mobile home ownerâs personal 168 data or data that is stored on a mobile home ownerâs device 169 beyond that which is necessary to make a payment for the lot 170 rental amount or user fees. 171 (2)âThis section applies prospectively and retroactively to 172 all lot rental agreements existing on July 1, 2026. 173 (3)âA person who is injured by a violation of this section 174 may file a complaint with the Department of Legal Affairs. The 175 Department of Legal Affairs has the authority to enforce 176 compliance with this section. The Department of Legal Affairs 177 may adopt rules to implement this subsection. 178 Section 6.âSubsection (2), paragraph (b) of subsection (4), 179 and subsection (6) of section 723.037, Florida Statutes, are 180 amended to read: 181 723.037âLot rental increases; reduction in services or 182 utilities; change in rules and regulations; mediation.â 183 (2)âNotice as required by this section shall, in addition 184 to the information required in subsection (1), must only be 185 required to include the dollar amount of the relevant portions 186 of the present lot rental amount that are being increased and 187 the dollar amount of the proposed increases in lot rental amount 188 if there is an increase in the lot rental amount, the reduction 189 in services or utilities, or the change in rules and regulations 190 and the effective date thereof. If there is a proposed increase 191 in the lot rental amount, all relevant invoices, evidence, or 192 proof that shows the expenses or material factors causing the 193 increase in the lot rental amount must be included in such 194 notice. 195 (4) 196 (b)1.âAt the meeting, the park owner or subdivision 197 developer shall in good faith disclose and explain all expenses 198 or material factors, including all relevant invoices, evidence, 199 or other proof, resulting in the decision to increase the lot 200 rental amount, reduce services or utilities, or change rules and 201 regulations, including how those factors justify the specific 202 change proposed. The park owner or subdivision developer may not 203 limit the discussion of the reasons for the change to 204 generalities only, such as, but not limited to, increases in 205 operational costs, changes in economic conditions, or rents 206 charged by comparable mobile home parks. For example, 207 2.âIf the reason for an increase in lot rental amount is an 208 increase in operational costs, the park owner must disclose and 209 provide evidence of the item or items which have increased, the 210 amount of the increase, any similar item or items which have 211 decreased, and the amount of the decrease. 212 3.âIf an amenity, a service, or a utility is no longer 213 available to mobile home owners, the park owner must reduce 214 their lot rental amount. 215 4.âIf an increase is based upon the lot rental amount 216 charged by comparable mobile home parks, the park owner shall 217 disclose, and provide in writing to the committee at or before 218 the meeting, the name, address, lot rental amount, and any other 219 relevant factors relied upon by the park owner, such as 220 facilities, services, and amenities, concerning the comparable 221 mobile home parks. The information concerning comparable mobile 222 home parks to be exchanged by the parties is to encourage a 223 dialogue concerning the reasons used by the park owner for the 224 increase in lot rental amount and to encourage the home owners 225 to evaluate and discuss the reasons for those changes with the 226 park owner. The park owner shall prepare a written summary of 227 the material factors and retain a copy for 3 years. The park 228 owner shall provide the committee a copy of the summary at or 229 before the meeting. 230 2.âThe park owner shall not limit the comparable mobile 231 home park disclosure to those mobile home parks that are owned 232 or operated by the same owner or operator as the subject park, 233 except in certain circumstances, which include, but are not 234 limited to: 235 a.âThat the market area for comparable mobile home parks 236 includes mobile home parks owned or operated by the same entity 237 that have similar facilities, services, and amenities; 238 b.âThat the subject mobile home park has unique attributes 239 that are shared with similar mobile home parks; 240 c.âThat the mobile home park is located in a geographic or 241 market area that contains few comparable mobile home parks; or 242 d.âThat there are similar considerations or factors that 243 would be considered in such a market analysis by a competent 244 professional and would be considered in determining the 245 valuation of the market rent. 246 5.âThe park owner shall prepare a written summary of the 247 expenses and material factors required in this paragraph and 248 retain a copy for 3 years. The park owner shall provide the 249 committee a copy of the summary at or before the meeting. 250 251 This subsection is not intended to be enforced by civil or 252 administrative action. Rather, the meetings and discussions are 253 intended to be in the nature of settlement discussions prior to 254 the parties proceeding to mediation of any dispute. 255 (6)âIf a party requests mediation and the opposing party 256 refuses to agree to mediate upon proper request, the party 257 refusing to mediate is shall not be entitled to attorney 258 attorneyâs fees in any action relating to a dispute described in 259 this section. Notwithstanding subsections (4) and (5), a person 260 may file a complaint with the Department of Legal Affairs if the 261 park owner fails to provide relevant invoices, evidence, or 262 proof of the expenses or material factors causing a proposed 263 increase in the lot rental amount. The Department of Legal 264 Affairs has the authority to enforce compliance with this 265 section. The Department of Legal Affairs may adopt rules to 266 implement this subsection. 267 Section 7.âSubsection (4) of section 723.038, Florida 268 Statutes, is amended to read: 269 723.038âDispute settlement; mediation.â 270 (4)(a)âAfter the date of the last scheduled meeting held 271 pursuant to s. 723.037(4), the parties to a dispute may agree to 272 immediately select a mediator and initiate mediation proceedings 273 pursuant to this section. The parties may accept the mediator 274 appointed by the division or, within 30 days, select a mediator 275 to mediate the dispute pursuant to subsection (2). 276 (b)âThe parties shall each pay a $250 filing fee to the 277 mediator appointed by the division or selected by the parties 278 within 30 days after the division notifies the parties of the 279 appointment of the mediator. The $250 filing fee shall be used 280 by the mediator to defray the hourly rate charged for mediation 281 of the dispute. Any portion of the filing fee not used shall be 282 refunded to the parties. 283 (c)âIf a party to the dispute refuses to mediate, the other 284 party may file a complaint with the Department of Legal Affairs. 285 Within 10 business days after receipt of the complaint, the 286 Department of Legal Affairs must appoint a mediator and 287 mediation must begin in accordance with this section. 288 Section 8.âParagraphs (a), (b), and (c) of subsection (1) 289 of section 723.061, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 290 723.061âEviction; grounds, proceedings.â 291 (1)âA mobile home park owner may evict a mobile home owner, 292 a mobile home tenant, a mobile home occupant, or a mobile home 293 only on one or more of the following grounds: 294 (a)âNonpayment of the lot rental amount. If a mobile home 295 owner, or tenant, or occupant, whoever whichever is responsible, 296 fails to pay the lot rental amount when due and such failure to 297 pay is not caused, directly or indirectly, by the mobile home 298 park ownerâs refusal to accept payment for the lot rental amount 299 or because the park owner has restricted the ability of the 300 mobile home owner, tenant, or occupant to pay the lot rental 301 amount when due, and if the default continues for 10 5 days 302 after delivery of a written demand by the mobile home park owner 303 for payment of the lot rental amount, the park owner may 304 terminate the tenancy. The mobile home owner, tenant, or 305 occupant; a family member or friend of the mobile home owner, 306 tenant, or occupant; or any other person, organization, or 307 charity may pay the lot rental amount by check or an electronic 308 transfer, and such payment must be accepted by the park owner, 309 operator of the mobile home park, or other designee of the park 310 owner. If payment is made by check, the amount due is considered 311 paid at the time the check is delivered to the park owner, 312 operator of the mobile home park, or other designee of the park 313 owner. However, if the mobile home owner, or tenant, or 314 occupant; a family member or friend of the mobile home owner, 315 tenant, or occupant; or any other person, organization, or 316 charity whichever is responsible, pays the lot rental amount 317 due, including any late charges, court costs, and attorney 318 attorneyâs fees, the court may, for good cause, deny the order 319 of eviction, if such nonpayment has not occurred more than 320 twice. 321 (b)âConviction of a violation of a federal or state law or 322 local ordinance, if the violation is detrimental to the health, 323 safety, or welfare of other residents of the mobile home park. 324 The mobile home owner, or mobile home tenant, or mobile home 325 occupant must vacate the premises within 7 days after the date 326 the notice to vacate is delivered. This paragraph constitutes 327 grounds to deny an initial tenancy of a purchaser of a home 328 under paragraph (e) or to evict an unapproved occupant of a 329 home. 330 (c)âViolation of a park rule or regulation, the rental 331 agreement, or this chapter. 332 1.âFor the first violation of any properly promulgated rule 333 or regulation, rental agreement provision, or this chapter which 334 is found by any court of competent jurisdiction to have been an 335 act that endangered the life, health, safety, or property of the 336 park residents or employees or the peaceful enjoyment of the 337 mobile home park by its residents, the mobile home park owner 338 may terminate the rental agreement, and the mobile home owner, 339 tenant, or occupant must vacate the premises within 7 days after 340 the notice to vacate is delivered. 341 2.âFor a second violation of the same properly promulgated 342 rule or regulation, rental agreement provision, or this chapter 343 within 12 months, the mobile home park owner may terminate the 344 tenancy if she or he has given the mobile home owner, tenant, or 345 occupant written notice, within 30 days after the first 346 violation, which specified the actions of the mobile home owner, 347 tenant, or occupant that caused the violation and gave the 348 mobile home owner, tenant, or occupant 7 days to correct the 349 noncompliance. The mobile home owner, tenant, or occupant must 350 have received written notice of the ground upon which she or he 351 is to be evicted at least 30 days before prior to the date on 352 which she or he is required to vacate. A second violation of a 353 properly promulgated rule or regulation, rental agreement 354 provision, or this chapter within 12 months after of the first 355 violation is unequivocally a ground for eviction, and it is not 356 a defense to any eviction proceeding that a violation has been 357 cured after the second violation. Violation of a rule or 358 regulation, rental agreement provision, or this chapter more 359 than 1 year after the first violation of the same rule or 360 regulation, rental agreement provision, or this chapter does not 361 constitute a ground for eviction under this section. 362 363 A properly promulgated rule or regulation may not be arbitrarily 364 applied and used as a ground for eviction or used as a basis for 365 a mobile home park owner to refuse to accept the payment of the 366 lot rental amount by any means, other than cash, or to otherwise 367 restrict the ability of a mobile home owner, a tenant, or an 368 occupant to pay the lot rental amount when due. 369 Section 9.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 370 723.0611, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 371 723.0611âFlorida Mobile Home Relocation Corporation.â 372 (1)(a)âThere is created the Florida Mobile Home Relocation 373 Corporation to address voluntary closures of mobile home parks 374 due to a change in the use of the land comprising the mobile 375 home park. The corporation shall be administered by a board of 376 directors made up of six members, three of whom shall be 377 appointed by the Secretary of Business and Professional 378 Regulation from a list of nominees submitted by the largest 379 nonprofit association representing mobile home owners in this 380 state, and three of whom shall be appointed by the Secretary of 381 Business and Professional Regulation from a list of nominees 382 submitted by the largest nonprofit association representing the 383 manufactured housing industry in this state. All members of the 384 board of directors, including the chair, shall be appointed to 385 serve for staggered 3-year terms. 386 Section 10.âSubsection (1) and subsections (4) and (7) of 387 section 723.0612, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 388 723.0612âChange in use; relocation expenses; payments by 389 park owner.â 390 (1)âIf a mobile home owner is required to move due to a 391 change in use of the land comprising the mobile home park as set 392 forth in s. 723.061(1)(d) and complies with the requirements of 393 this section, the mobile home owner is entitled to payment from 394 the Florida Mobile Home Relocation Corporation of: 395 (a)âThe amount of actual moving expenses of relocating the 396 mobile home to a new location within a 50-mile radius of the 397 vacated park, or 398 (b)âThe amount of $6,500 $3,000 for a single-section mobile 399 home or $11,500 $6,000 for a multisection mobile home, whichever 400 is less. Moving expenses include the cost of taking down, 401 moving, and setting up the mobile home in a new location. 402 (4)âThe Florida Mobile Home Relocation Corporation must 403 approve payment within 45 days after receipt of the information 404 set forth in subsection (3), or payment is deemed approved. A 405 copy of the approval must be forwarded to the park owner with an 406 invoice for payment. Upon approval, the corporation shall issue 407 a voucher in the amount of the contract price for relocating the 408 mobile home. The moving contractor may redeem the voucher within 409 2 years after the date of issuance from the corporation 410 following completion of the relocation and upon approval of the 411 relocation by the mobile home owner. 412 (7)âIn lieu of collecting payment from the Florida Mobile 413 Home Relocation Corporation as set forth in subsection (1), a 414 mobile home owner may abandon the mobile home in the mobile home 415 park and collect $5,000 $1,375 for a single section and $7,000 416 $2,750 for a multisection from the corporation as long as the 417 mobile home owner delivers to the park owner the current title 418 to the mobile home duly endorsed by the owner of record and 419 valid releases of all liens shown on the title. If a mobile home 420 owner chooses this option, the park owner must pay shall make 421 payment to the corporation $1,375 for a single section mobile 422 home and $2,750 for a multisection mobile home in an amount 423 equal to the amount the mobile home owner is entitled to under 424 this subsection. The mobile home ownerâs application for funds 425 under this subsection requires shall require the submission of a 426 document signed by the park owner stating that the home has been 427 abandoned under this subsection and that the park owner agrees 428 to make payment to the corporation in the amount provided herein 429 to the home owner under this subsection. However, in the event 430 that the required documents are not submitted with the 431 application, the corporation may consider the facts and 432 circumstances surrounding the abandonment of the home to 433 determine whether the mobile home owner is entitled to payment 434 under pursuant to this subsection. The mobile home owner is not 435 entitled to any compensation under this subsection if there is a 436 pending eviction action for nonpayment of lot rental amount 437 pursuant to s. 723.061(1)(a) which was filed against him or her 438 before prior to the mailing date of the notice of change in the 439 use of the mobile home park given pursuant to s. 723.061(1)(d). 440 Section 11.âParagraph (b) of subsection (6) of section 441 723.011, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 442 723.011âDisclosure prior to rental of a mobile home lot; 443 prospectus, filing, approval.â 444 (6) 445 (b)âIf a park owner violates this section and a lessee 446 suffers a substantial loss or damage to the lesseeâs mobile home 447 or personal property as a result of flooding, the lessee may 448 terminate the rental agreement by giving a written notice of 449 termination to the park owner no later than 30 days after the 450 date of the damage or loss. Termination of a rental agreement 451 under this section is effective when the requirements of s. 452 723.023(1)(e) s. 723.023(5) are met. For the purpose of this 453 paragraph, the term âsubstantial loss or damageâ means the total 454 cost of repairs to or replacement of the mobile home and 455 personal property is 50 percent or more of the mobile home and 456 personal propertyâs market value on the date the flooding 457 occurred. 458 Section 12.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.